District of Columbia statutes.
31-3602

Scope.

(a)

Any policy or rider advertised, marketed, or offered as long-term care or nursing home insurance delivered or issued for delivery in the District of Columbia shall comply with the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

This chapter is not intended to supersede the obligations of entities subject to this chapter to comply with the substance of other applicable insurance laws insofar as they do not conflict with this chapter; except that, this chapter shall supersede laws and regulations designed and intended to apply to Medicare supplement insurance policies.

(c)

The requirements of this chapter shall apply to policies delivered or issued for delivery in the District of Columbia on or after May 23, 2000.

History

May 23, 2000, D.C. Law 13-121, § 3, 47 DCR 2038